Idaho, session 2025, H0146.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 5, Title 21, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 21-515B, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
21-515B. WIND ENERGY CONVERSION SYSTEMS -- LIGHT-MITIGATING TECHNOL-
OGY SYSTEMS. (1) On and after July 1, 2025, no new wind energy conversion
system shall commence commercial operations in this state unless the de-
veloper, owner, or operator of the wind energy conversion system applies to
the federal aviation administration for installation of a light-mitigat-
ing technology system that complies with federal aviation administration
regulations 14 CFR 1.1, et seq. If approved by the federal aviation admin-
istration, the developer, owner, or operator of such wind energy conversion
system shall install the light-mitigating technology system on approved
turbines within twenty-four (24) months after receipt of such approval.
(2) On and after January 1, 2026, any developer, owner, or operator of
a wind energy conversion system that has commenced commercial operations in
the state without a light-mitigating technology system shall apply to the
federal aviation administration for installation and operation of a light-
mitigating technology system that complies with federal aviation adminis-
tration regulations 14 CFR 1.1, et seq. If approved by the federal aviation
administration, the developer, owner, or operator of such wind energy con-
version system shall install the light-mitigating technology system on ap-
proved turbines within sixty (60) months following such approval.
(3) Any developer, owner, or operator who is required to apply to
install a light-mitigating technology system on a wind energy conversion
system pursuant to the requirements of this section and who is approved by
the federal aviation administration for such installation shall provide to
the Idaho transportation department division of aeronautics, in the form
and manner prescribed by the division, notice of the progress of the instal-
lation of such light-mitigating technology system. If the installation of
the light-mitigating technology system is delayed beyond a timeframe es-
tablished pursuant to this section, the developer, owner, or operator shall
provide notice to the Idaho transportation department division of aeronau-
tics not less than once every three (3) months to provide an update on the
reasons for the delay and the current status of the installation.
(4) Any costs associated with the installation, implementation, oper-
ation, and maintenance of a light-mitigating technology system shall be the


responsibility of the developer, owner, or operator of the wind energy con-
version system.
(5) As used in this section:
(a) "Light-mitigating technology system" means aircraft detection
lighting or any other comparable system capable of reducing the impact
of facility obstruction lighting while maintaining conspicuity suffi-
cient to assist aircraft in identifying and avoiding collision with a
wind energy conversion system.
(b) "Wind energy conversion system" means an electricity genera-
tion facility consisting of five (5) or more wind turbines that are
fifty (50) feet or taller in height and any accessory structures and
buildings, including substations, meteorological towers, electrical
infrastructure, transmission lines, and other appurtenant structures.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.